Washington statutes.
RCW 36.67.060

Bond retirement.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall be retired by an annual tax levy and by any other moneys lawfully available and pledged therefor.

[ 1984 c 186 s 28; 1983 c 167 s 77; 1975 1st ex.s. c 188 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.67.060. Prior: (i) 1890 p 39 s 6; RRS s 5580. (ii) 1890 p 39 s 7; RRS s 5581.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.